Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-2,102
Public schools; secret organizations; denial of school privileges; expulsion.

Any school board or board of education may deny any or all school privileges to any regularly enrolled student who violates section 79-2,101 or may expel any such student for failure or refusal to comply with such section.

Laws 1909, c. 121, § 2, p. 461;

R.S.1913, § 6946;

C.S.1922, § 6528;

C.S.1929, § 79-2105;

R.S.1943, § 79-2116;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 165, p. 747;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,127;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 107.